Utah statutes.
75-7-1007.   Event affecting administration or distribution.

If the happening of an event, including marriage, divorce, performance of educational requirements, or death, affects the administration or distribution of a trust, a trustee is not liable for a loss resulting from the trustee's lack of knowledge or lack of notice.



Enacted by Chapter 89, 2004 General Session

